test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - C - zhiishiib :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     zhiishiip+NA: zhiishiib
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+zhiishiip+NA: nzhiishiib
     2+zhiishiip+NA: gzhiishiib
     X+zhiishiip+NA: zhiishiib
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     zhiishiip+NA+Con: zhiishiibenh
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim: zhiishiibens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej: zhiishiibish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     zhiishiip+NA+Prt: zhiishiibba
     zhiishiip+NA+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     zhiishiip+NA+4: zhiishiiban
     zhiishiip+NA+Loc: zhiishiibing
     zhiishiip+NA+Pl: zhiishiibag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con: nzhiishiibenh
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim: nzhiishiibens
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con: gzhiishiibenh
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim: gzhiishiibens
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con: zhiishiibenh
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim: zhiishiibens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos: nzhiishiibim
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos: gzhiishiibim
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos: zhiishiibim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej: nzhiishiibish
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej: gzhiishiibish
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pej: zhiishiibish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl: nzhiishiibnaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl: gzhiishiibnaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl: gzhiishiibwaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+3+4: zhiishiibni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Prt: nzhiishiibba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibdig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Prt: gzhiishiibba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibdig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Prt: zhiishiibba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+4: nzhiishiiban
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Loc: nzhiishiibing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pl: nzhiishiibag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+4: gzhiishiiban
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Loc: gzhiishiibing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pl: gzhiishiibag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+4: zhiishiiban
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Loc: zhiishiibing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+4: zhiishiiban
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Loc: zhiishiibing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pl: zhiishiibag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej: zhiishiibenyish
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej: zhiishiibensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt: zhiishiibenyba
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibenydig
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt: zhiishiibensba
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+4: zhiishiibenyin
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Loc: zhiishiibenying
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pl: zhiishiibenyig
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+4: zhiishiibensan
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Loc: zhiishiibensing
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pl: zhiishiibensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibshiba
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+4: zhiishiibshan
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibshing
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     zhiishiip+NA+Prt+4: zhiishiibbaniin
     zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibbaniing
     zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos: nzhiishiibenyim
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos: nzhiishiibensim
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos: gzhiishiibenyim
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gzhiishiibensim
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos: zhiishiibenyim
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos: zhiishiibensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej: nzhiishiibenyish
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej: nzhiishiibensish
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej: gzhiishiibenyish
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej: gzhiishiibensish
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej: zhiishiibenyish
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej: zhiishiibensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl: nzhiishiibenynaa
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl: nzhiishiibensnaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+1+Pl: gzhiishiibenynaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+2+Pl: gzhiishiibenywaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gzhiishiibensnaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gzhiishiibenswaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+3+4: zhiishiibenyni
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+3+4: zhiishiibensni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt: nzhiishiibenyba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibenydig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt: nzhiishiibensba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibensdig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt: gzhiishiibenyba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibenydig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt: gzhiishiibensba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibensdig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt: zhiishiibenyba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibenydig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt: zhiishiibensba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+4: nzhiishiibenyin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Loc: nzhiishiibenying
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pl: nzhiishiibenyig
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+4: nzhiishiibensan
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Loc: nzhiishiibensing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pl: nzhiishiibensag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+4: gzhiishiibenyin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Loc: gzhiishiibenying
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pl: gzhiishiibenyig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+4: gzhiishiibensan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Loc: gzhiishiibensing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pl: gzhiishiibensag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+4: zhiishiibenyin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Loc: zhiishiibenying
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+4: zhiishiibensan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Loc: zhiishiibensing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+4: zhiishiibenyin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Loc: zhiishiibenying
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pl: zhiishiibenyig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+4: zhiishiibensan
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Loc: zhiishiibensing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pl: zhiishiibensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej: nzhiishiibmish
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gzhiishiibmish
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pej: zhiishiibmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: nzhiishiibminaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gzhiishiibminaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gzhiishiibmiwaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+3+4: zhiishiibmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt: nzhiishiibmiba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibmidig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gzhiishiibmiba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibmidig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Prt: zhiishiibmiba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+4: nzhiishiibman
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Loc: nzhiishiibming
     1+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pl: nzhiishiibmag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+4: gzhiishiibman
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gzhiishiibming
     2+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gzhiishiibmag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+4: zhiishiibman
     3+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Loc: zhiishiibming
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+4: zhiishiibman
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Loc: zhiishiibming
     X+zhiishiip+NA+ThmPos+Pl: zhiishiibmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl: nzhiishiibshinaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gzhiishiibshinaa
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gzhiishiibshiwaa
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+3+4: zhiishiibshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt: nzhiishiibshiba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibshidig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt: gzhiishiibshiba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibshidig
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibshiba
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+4: nzhiishiibshan
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Loc: nzhiishiibshing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Pl: nzhiishiibshag
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+4: gzhiishiibshan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Loc: gzhiishiibshing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Pl: gzhiishiibshag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+4: zhiishiibshan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibshing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+4: zhiishiibshan
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibshing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Prt: nzhiishiibnaanba
     1+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nzhiishiibnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibnaanba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibnaandig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gzhiishiibwaaba
     2+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gzhiishiibwaadig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+3+4+Prt: zhiishiibniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+4: nzhiishiibnaanin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Loc: nzhiishiibnaaning
     1+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Pl: nzhiishiibnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+4: gzhiishiibnaanin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibnaaning
     2+zhiishiip+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibnaanig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+4: gzhiishiibwaan
     2+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gzhiishiibwaang
     2+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gzhiishiibwaag
     3+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+4: zhiishiibwaan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+2+Pl+Loc: zhiishiibwaang
     3+zhiishiip+NA+3+4+4: zhiishiibniwan
     3+zhiishiip+NA+3+4+Loc: zhiishiibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+4: nzhiishiibbaniin
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Loc: nzhiishiibbaniing
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Pl: nzhiishiibbaniig
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+4: gzhiishiibbaniin
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Loc: gzhiishiibbaniing
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Pl: gzhiishiibbaniig
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+4: zhiishiibbaniin
     3+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+4: zhiishiibbaniin
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibbaniing
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibenyshiba
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibenyshidig
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: zhiishiibensshiba
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: zhiishiibensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+4: zhiishiibenyshan
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibenyshing
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibenyshag
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+4: zhiishiibensshan
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibensshing
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibensshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+4: zhiishiibenybaniin
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenybaniing
     zhiishiip+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibenybaniig
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+4: zhiishiibensbaniin
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensbaniing
     zhiishiip+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibensbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibshibniin
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibshibniing
     zhiishiip+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibshibniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nzhiishiibenymish
     1+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nzhiishiibensmish
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gzhiishiibenymish
     2+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gzhiishiibensmish
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: zhiishiibenymish
     X+zhiishiip+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: zhiishiibensmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
